Illinois, session 104th, HB4201.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Educational 5Choice for Illinois Children Act. 6    Section 2. Findings. The General Assembly makes all of the 7following findings:8        (1) Section 1 of Article X of the Illinois 9    Constitution provides that "[a] fundamental goal of the 10    People of the State is the educational development of all 11    persons to the limits of their capacities.". However, the 12    State has failed to meet this goal. According to the 2024 13    National Assessment of Educational Progress (NAEP), 62% of 14    4th graders in the State were below proficient in 15    mathematics, and 68% of 8th graders in the State were 16    below proficient in mathematics. In reading, 70% of 4th 17    graders were below proficient, and 67% of 8th graders were 18    below proficient.19        (2) H.R. 1 of the 119th Congress, the One Big 20    Beautiful Bill Act, was recently signed into law. It 21    offers a federal tax credit of up to $1,700 for 22    individuals who donate to scholarship granting 23    organizations, thereby increasing funding for these   HB4201- 2 -LRB104 15959 LNS 29197 b1    organizations to help families pay for their children to 2    attend the kindergarten through grade 12 school of their 3    choice. The list of eligible educational expenses includes 4    tuition, fees, tutoring, educational therapies, 5    transportation, technology, and other expenses for 6    children attending public schools and private schools.7        (3) Illinois experienced great success with its own 8    tax credit program, the Invest in Kids Act, which was 9    allowed to expire at the end of 2023. According to the 10    Department of Revenue, over 40,940 scholarships were 11    awarded during the time that the Invest in Kids Act was 12    active. Failure to opt into the provisions of the One Big 13    Beautiful Bill Act would place this State at a competitive 14    disadvantage with surrounding states that are likely to 15    opt into the school choice provisions of the One Big 16    Beautiful Bill Act.17        (4) The ability to choose where a child goes to school 18    should not be a privilege reserved for the wealthy. Too 19    many students are trapped in an educational learning 20    environment that fails to meet their needs, and the 21    financial burden of attending a different school is too 22    often out of reach. Scholarships from scholarship granting 23    organizations under the One Big Beautiful Bill Act can 24    help alleviate this financial burden for families that 25    could not otherwise afford private school and would result 26    in no additional cost to the State.  HB4201- 3 -LRB104 15959 LNS 29197 b1        (5) It is the purpose of this Act to support school 2    choice in this State by directing the State Board of 3    Education to develop a list of scholarship granting 4    organizations to which qualified contributions may be made 5    under Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code. 6    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 72-3.208 as follows: 8    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.208 new)9    Sec. 2-3.208. Federal-qualifying scholarships.10    (a) Pursuant to Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code, 11the General Assembly voluntarily elects the State to do each 12of the following:13        (1) Participate in the federal tax credit established 14    under Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code for 15    individuals who make qualified contributions to 16    scholarship granting organizations.17        (2) Identify scholarship granting organizations 18    located in this State in accordance with this Section.19    (b) The State Board of Education is authorized and 20empowered to certify and submit a list of qualifying 21scholarship granting organizations to the Secretary of the 22Treasury of the United States in accordance with Section 25F 23of the Internal Revenue Code and its associated regulations as 24provided in this Section.   HB4201- 4 -LRB104 15959 LNS 29197 b1    (c) By January 1, 2027 and by every January 1 thereafter, 2the State Board shall submit to the Secretary of the Treasury 3of the United States and publish on the State Board's Internet 4website a list of all scholarship granting organizations that 5meet the requirements of Section 25F of the Internal Revenue 6Code and are located in this State. As part of the submission, 7the State Board shall certify its authority to submit the list 8on behalf of the State and comply with any other requirements 9of Section 25F of the Internal Revenue Code, its associated 10regulations, or other applicable guidance issued by the 11Secretary of the Treasury of the United States.